Massachusetts, session 194th, S865.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (n1/2) of section 5 of chapter 614 of the acts of 1968, as inserted
by section 47 of chapter 288 of the Acts of 2010, is hereby amended by striking out the words
“community hospitals” and inserting in place thereof the following:- acute care hospitals.
SECTION 2. Subsection (g) of section 10 of said chapter 614, as amended by section 21
of chapter 9 of the Acts of 2011, is hereby further amended by striking out the words
“community hospital” in each instance in which they appear and inserting in place thereof the
following:- “acute care hospital”.
SECTION 3. Said subsection (g) of said section 10 of said chapter 614, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by striking out the words “community hospitals” in each instance in
which they appear and inserting in place thereof the following:- “acute care hospitals”.
SECTION 4. Said subsection (g) of said section 10 of said chapter 614, as so appearing,
is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (12) in its entirety.
of 1